Massachusetts, session 194th, H577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out subsection (gg) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(gg) Any district whose total charter school tuition amount is greater than its total charter
school tuition amount for the previous year shall be reimbursed by the commonwealth in
accordance with this paragraph and subject to appropriation; provided, however, that no funds
for said reimbursements shall be deducted from funds distributed pursuant to chapter 70. The
district's reimbursement shall be 100 per cent of the increase in the year in which the increase
occurs, 80 per cent of the increase in the year following the increase, 60 per cent of the increase
in the second year following the increase and 40 per cent of the increase in the third year
following the increase.
of 1